Louisiana, session 2026, HB196.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:1208 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1208. Amount of personal leave
Every teacher employed by a parish or city school board of this state, except
those employees who receive annual leave, shall be entitled to and shall be allowed
to use up to two four days absence during each school year to be used for such
purposes as may be determined by the individual teacher without loss of pay. The
teacher requesting such leave shall give his principal at least twenty-four hours
notice prior to taking the leave without loss of pay. Personal leave shall be charged
to and deducted from the teacher's sick leave for the current year or sick leave
accumulated as provided in R.S. 17:1201. Personal leave shall not be accumulated
from year to year, nor shall personal leave be compensated for upon death or
retirement or paid in any other manner except as provided for in this Section.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.